test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-asi47_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - asi: # Noun (47) asi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     asi+N+Sg+Nom: asi
     asi+N+Sg+Gen: as'a
     asi+N+Sg+Par: asja
     asi+N+Sg+Ill: asja
     asi+N+Sg+Ine: [as'an, as'ah, as'ahn]
     asi+N+Sg+Ela: as'ast
     asi+N+Sg+All: as'alõ
     asi+N+Sg+Ade: as'al
     asi+N+Sg+Abl: as'alt
     asi+N+Sg+Tra: as'as
     asi+N+Sg+Ter: as'aniq
     asi+N+Sg+Abe: as'aldaq
     asi+N+Sg+Com: as'agaq
     asi+N+Pl+Nom: as'aq
     asi+N+Pl+Gen: asjo
     asi+N+Pl+Par: asjo
     asi+N+Pl+Ill: [asjohe, asjo, asjodõ]
     asi+N+Pl+Ine: [as'on, as'oh, as'ohn]
     asi+N+Pl+Ela: as'ost
     asi+N+Pl+All: as'olõ
     asi+N+Pl+Ade: as'ol
     asi+N+Pl+Abl: as'olt
     asi+N+Pl+Tra: as'os
     asi+N+Pl+Ter: as'oniq
     asi+N+Pl+Abe: as'oldaq
     asi+N+Pl+Com: asjogaq
